Louisiana, session 2026, HB1114.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:921 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§921. Grounds for disciplinary proceedings; reinstatement
A. The board may deny, revoke, suspend, probate, limit, or restrict any
license to practice as a registered nurse or an advanced practice registered nurse,
impose fines, and assess costs, or otherwise discipline a licensee and the board may
limit, restrict, delay, or deny a student nurse from entering or continuing the clinical
phase of nursing education upon proof that the licensee or student nurse:
(1) Is guilty of selling or attempting to sell, falsely obtaining, or furnishing
any nursing diploma or license to practice as a registered nurse.
(2) Is convicted of a crime or offense which reflects the inability of the
nurse to practice nursing with due regard for the health and safety of clients or
patients or enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a criminal charge regardless
of final disposition of the criminal proceeding, including, but not limited to,
expungement or nonadjudication.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1866 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1114
(3) Is unfit or incompetent by reason of negligence, habit, or other cause.
(4) Has demonstrated actual or potential inability to practice nursing with
reasonable skill and safety to individuals because of use of alcohol or drugs; or has
demonstrated inability to practice nursing with reasonable skill and safety to
individuals because of illness or as a result of any mental or physical condition.
(5) Is guilty of aiding or abetting anyone in the violation of any provisions
of this Part.
(6) Is mentally incompetent.
(7) Has had a license to practice nursing or to practice as another health care
healthcare provider denied, revoked, suspended, or otherwise restricted.
(9) Has violated any provision of this Part.
B.(1) A nurse applying for reinstatement following a license suspension
related to a substance use disorder may submit an independent medical evaluation
from a licensed physician, psychiatrist, or advanced practice registered nurse
qualified in addiction medicine with the United States Drug Enforcement
Administration.
(2) The board shall recognize medication-assisted treatment, including but
not limited to treatment with buprenorphine, methadone, or naltrexone, as an
evidence-based treatment for opioid use disorder.
(3) The board shall not deny reinstatement solely on the basis that a nurse
is receiving medication-assisted treatment prescribed by a licensed healthcare
professional. The board shall not require an evaluation from a board-contracted
physician when a qualified independent evaluation is provided.